Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2024 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 418.746
to 418.796.
SECTION 2. The Legislative Assembly finds that  children’s advocacy centers rely upon
state funding and it is necessary and in the public interest to provide children’s advocacy
centers and employees of children’s advocacy centers with certain immunities  from civil li-
ability arising out of children’s advocacy centers’ good faith participation in  conducting
statutorily mandated child abuse assessments.
SECTION 3.
(1) If a children’s advocacy center  provides evidence that it is a member in
good standing of, or is actively working toward accreditation by, a national  organization that
provides accreditation based on nationally recognized  standards and on evidence-based
measures, an employee or designated agent  of the children’s advocacy center who is partic-
ipating in good faith in a child abuse assessment and who has reasonable grounds for  that
participation and for the conclusions or diagnoses made in  that assessment shall have im-
munity:
(a) From any civil liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed with respect  to
participating in the assessment; and
(b) With respect to participating in any judicial proceeding resulting from the assess-
ment.
(2) A children’s advocacy  center shall have the same immunity from any civil liability
that might otherwise be incurred with respect to its employees’ or designated agents’ par-
ticipation in a child abuse assessment as described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Nothing in this section provides a children’s advocacy  center with immunity from li-
ability for discrimination by its  employees or designated agents if the discrimination is on
the basis of a protected class, as defined in ORS 652.210.
(4) Nothing in this  section may be construed to limit or otherwise affect the liability of
any person for damages resulting from the person’s:
(a) Gross negligence;
(b) Reckless, wanton or intentional misconduct;
(c) Abuse or neglect of the child who is the subject of the child abuse assessment; or
(d) Medical malpractice.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1587 (SB 1587-A) Page 1
(5) As used in this section, “designated agent” means a person contracted by a  children’s
advocacy center to conduct child abuse assessments.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this 2024 Act applies to acts occurring on or after the effective
date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate February 22, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1587 (SB 1587-A) Page 2